Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. General Provisions for Control and Eradication of Livestock and Animal Diseases.

§ 69-15-101.
Areas for control of diseases of livestock and poultry.

The boards of supervisors of any county, or one or more counties, are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to establish areas composed of one or more counties for the purpose of cooperating with the Board of Animal Health and the United States Bureau of Animal Industry, separately or jointly, in providing for a program of control and eradication of certain diseases of livestock and poultry within such area established.

Boards of supervisors of any county or counties acting under the authority conferred by this section are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to contribute to the support of such area program in an amount equal to thirty-three and one-third per cent of the cost of administering the program in such area. The cost of administering such program to be determined by the board and entered upon their minutes at the time funds are appropriated for the support of same. The funds herein authorized to be expended by the board or boards of supervisors of each county or group of counties comprising such area shall be paid out of the General Fund of such county or counties on order of the board of supervisors duly entered on their minutes.

The Board of Animal Health is hereby authorized to purchase and supply at cost any vaccine necessary for use in control and eradication of diseases of livestock and poultry in such area hereby authorized to be established, to the owners of livestock or poultry residing in an area cooperating with the control program hereby authorized.

In order that any area created under the provisions of this section may have the services of a veterinarian, the board of animal health is hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to employ a veterinarian for such area, and such area veterinarian shall have the authority to employ local veterinarians with the approval of the board of animal health, and the board of supervisors of the county or counties comprising such area are authorized and empowered to contribute to the payment of the salary of such veterinarians employed by the board of animal health.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4861.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 197, §§ 1-4.

§ 69-15-103.
Spraying to prevent spread of disease at state fairs and community sale barns.

All pens, stalls, barns, or other places where livestock are placed or held for exhibits or shows at all fairs within the state shall be sprayed with an approved insecticide before any animals are placed therein, and immediately after removal of such animals, all such pens, stalls, barns, or other places where such animals have been confined shall be sprayed with an approved disinfectant. Such spraying shall be done under the direction or supervision of the board of animal health. It shall be the duty of the fair managers to see that the provisions hereof are complied with.

All community sale barns within the state where any kind of livestock is sold, shall be sprayed with an approved insecticide before any animals are placed therein and immediately after removal of such animals. Such spraying shall be done at the expense of the owners of said sale barns, and done under directions of the board of animal health. Failure by the owners of said sale barns to comply with the provisions hereof shall be punished by a fine imposed upon them of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4861.7; Laws, 1948, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2.

§ 69-15-105.
County or district to establish program to control or eradicate ticks, flies, and other external parasites.

The boards of supervisors in the various counties are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to put into effect the provisions of this section by order of said respective boards spread upon the minutes of such board when petitioned by a majority of livestock owners in any county or affected district.

The board of supervisors of any county, when petitioned, electing to come under the provisions of this section shall be authorized to appropriate money from the general fund or fix the levy annually of an ad valorem tax, not to exceed two (2) mills, upon the assessed valuation of all real and personal property within the area petitioned for and/or fix a fee not to exceed Twenty-five Cents (25¢) per head on livestock annually, based on cost estimates for a program of controlling or eradicating ticks, flies, and other nuisance insects by dipping livestock or by other appropriate methods.

The board of supervisors of any county, upon designating an area where the program shall be operated, shall request the technical assistance of the Board of Animal Health. The Board of Animal Health shall cooperate in general planning, technical supervision, furnish specifications for vats, and other equipment, select approved chemical agents and test same for effectiveness.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to construct dipping vats in suitable locations, purchase other equipment and supplies, and employ such personnel as necessary, including inspectors who shall be enforcement officers for the county board of supervisors.

It shall be the duty of each livestock owner within the area of program operations to cooperate with the board of supervisors and its representatives and comply with the provisions of this section.

The board of supervisors of any county shall have the authority to require all owners when necessary to assemble all their livestock at a designated time and place and have same dipped or treated according to prescribed methods.

Owners who refuse or fail to comply after having been duly notified to have livestock assembled and dipped or treated as prescribed shall be in violation of the provisions of this section and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69.

The purpose of this section is to supplement and be in addition to Section 69-15-307, Mississippi Code of 1972, and related statutes. Nothing in this section to the contrary shall replace or minimize existing statute concerning existing laws for the eradication of the cattle fever tick (Margaropus annulatus).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4861.3; Laws, 1956, ch. 139, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-107.
Brucellosis eradication.

In addition to other authority vested in the Board of Animal Health, it shall have the following powers and duties:

To quarantine all herds of cattle where reactors are disclosed or found by private tests, auction barn sale tests, market cattle testing of slaughter cattle and dairy herds that are suspicious to the brucellosis ring test (milk).

Owners of herds so quarantined in counties carrying out brucellosis eradication programs either in cooperation with the board of supervisors or Animal Health Division, Agricultural Research Services, USDA, shall have a maximum of sixty (60) days from date of quarantine issuance in which to have the quarantined portion of their herd officially tested for brucellosis. The herd owner shall be responsible for making herd test arrangements, using at his option either the federal veterinarian assigned to his area or any private practitioner licensed to test cattle in the herd owner’s county under the area plan. It shall be the herd owner’s responsibility to assemble, confine, and hold the quarantined cattle at a time and place agreed upon by himself and his selected veterinarian for the purpose of identifying and testing those animals required to be tested under the uniform methods and rules for establishing and maintaining modified certified brucellosis areas adopted by the United States Livestock Sanitary Association and approved by the Animal Health Division, Agricultural Research Services, USDA. These uniform methods and rules shall be followed explicitly in carrying out all official area brucellosis testing work, and owners of quarantined herds shall be responsible for retesting of quarantined portions of their herds within time limits prescribed by these rules. Within these time limits, quarantined herd owners shall enjoy the same options for veterinarian selection and time and test location as outlined above for the original test.

Owners of quarantined herds who fail to take action in having their herd officially tested for brucellosis within sixty (60) days of quarantine issuance shall upon notice from the State Veterinarian assemble or have assembled these quarantined cattle at a place and time designated in order that the brucellosis test may be applied. Assistance shall be given by such owners in confining these cattle in order that the test may be administered properly, and the same cattle shall be returned for checking, tagging and branding of reactors at a time and place designated by the inspector or veterinarian in charge. It shall be the duty of the sheriff in any county in which the work of brucellosis testing is in progress to render to agents of the Board of Animal Health every assistance in enforcing the laws and regulations of said board. If the sheriff of any county shall neglect, fail or refuse to render this assistance when so required, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be punishable as in other cases of malfeasance or misfeasance.

All cattle which have reacted to the brucellosis test shall be tagged and branded and removed from the herd of cattle and shall be permitted to market for slaughter within a period of fifteen (15) days after the date of tagging and branding. When funds are available from the state or federal government, indemnities will be paid to the owner of reactors when properly appraised and disposed of.

As stated in paragraph (b), current uniform methods and rules for establishing and maintaining modified certified brucellosis areas adopted by the United States Livestock Sanitary Association and approved by the Animal Health Division, Agricultural Research Services, USDA, shall be followed.

Any person, firm or corporation failing to comply with any of the provisions of this section or interfering with any duly appointed officer of the Board of Animal Health in the discharge of his duty, or for having discharged his duties, shall be deemed in violation of the provisions of this section and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4837.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-109.
Emergency control of foot and mouth disease and other infectious diseases of animals and poultry.

The Governor of the State of Mississippi, when advised by the Board of Animal Health that an emergency exists due to the presence of foot and mouth disease, rinderpest, contagious pleuropneumonia, or other contagious or infectious diseases of animals, or European fowl pest and similar diseases among poultry, in this state, or chronic wasting disease in any cervids, is hereby authorized to declare a state of emergency and to order all animals or poultry quarantined or slaughtered that may be affected with, or possible carriers of such diseases.

The Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to cooperate with any department of the federal government engaged in the combating and control of any such disease mentioned in subsection (1) and to this end the Governor is authorized and empowered to do any and all things in cooperation with the federal government necessary to the control and extermination of any such diseases mentioned in subsection (1) among animals or poultry that may be affected therewith.

For the purposes of this section, the Governor shall have full and complete police power, and shall exercise same anywhere in the State of Mississippi, and if an emergency should exist to such an extent that such becomes necessary the Governor may employ such personnel to enforce such police powers and quarantine that may be necessary to control and prevent the spreading of any such diseases mentioned in subsection (1) among animals or poultry in this state. Such personnel when appointed by the Governor shall work under the direction of the Mississippi Board of Animal Health, or its representative, and shall be paid such compensation as the Governor may determine out of any money made available for the enforcement of this section.

When any animals or poultry or materials are ordered to be destroyed, under the provisions of this section, the owner of same shall be paid for each such animal or poultry or materials destroyed an amount not exceeding the amount authorized to be paid by the federal government in matching funds expended for the destruction of each such animal or poultry or materials infected with any such diseases mentioned in subsection (1).

In the event of the happening of an outbreak of any such diseases mentioned in subsection (1) in Mississippi, the Governor is hereby authorized to borrow not to exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) to carry out the terms and provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4847.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 196, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1954, ch. 149, §§ 1-5 [¶¶ 1-5]; Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 69-15-111.
Livestock; how brought into state.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm or corporation to drive, convey, transport or allow to drift from any state or territory, into this state any livestock except under the supervision and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health. Steers may be moved into the state for feeding and grazing purposes under special permit issued by the State Veterinarian.

Livestock shipped, trailed, driven or otherwise transported into this state from other states or territories shall be subject to examinations and tests approved by the Board of Animal Health for the purpose of determining if such animals are free of infectious abortion or bangs disease. Should such animals react to the tests, they shall immediately upon notice to the owner from the board or one (1) of the board’s inspectors or veterinarians be returned to the state from which they came, or slaughtered under the supervision and direction of the board. The Board of Animal Health is authorized and empowered to require livestock owners or persons having livestock in charge, affected with, or exposed to infectious abortion, upon notice to assemble or have assembled such livestock at a place and time designated by an inspector or veterinarian of the Board of Animal Health or of the United States Bureau of Animal Industry in order that the proper and necessary tests and examinations can be made. All animals which react to the test for infectious abortion or show marked diagnostic symptoms of infectious abortion shall be quarantined, segregated, isolated or otherwise disposed of under the direction of the Board of Animal Health.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section or any of the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health shall be deemed in violation of the provisions of this section and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5439; 1942, § 4862; Laws, 1930, ch. 91; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-113.
Infected livestock; pay for when destroyed.

Owners of livestock infected with any contagious or infectious disease, whose animals are destroyed by authority of the board of animal health shall receive compensation from the state in accordance with the following provisions:

Before authorizing the destruction of such diseased animals, they shall be appraised by a duly commissioned representative of the board of animal health of the State of Mississippi or a cooperating representative of the U. S. Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry, duly commissioned by said board of animal health. If the owner shall refuse to accept such appraisal, the animals shall be appraised (under oath) by three competent and disinterested appraisers; one to be selected by the duly commissioned representative of the board of animal health or of the U. S. Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry duly commissioned by said board of animal health, one by the owner, and those two to select a third; the appraisal to be based upon the value of the animals at the time the animals are condemned for destruction; and, provided, further, that the state to pay not to exceed one-third of the difference between the appraised value of each animal so destroyed and the value of the salvage thereof, when any portion of said appraised value is paid by the U. S. Department of Agriculture, and not more than two-thirds thereof in the event no portion is paid by said U. S. Department of Agriculture. In no event shall the state be liable on an appraised value exceeding $25.00 per head for grade cattle and $50.00 per head for registered purebred cattle.

Upon receipt of a duly certified copy of the appraisal of the stock condemned to be destroyed, and a certificate from the board of animal health that the condemned stock has been destroyed in accordance with the rules and regulations of said board, a requisition shall be issued, signed by the executive officer and the chairman of the state board of animal health, authorizing the state auditor to issue a warrant for the amount stipulated out of funds in the state treasury especially appropriated for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5501; 1930, § 5416; 1942, § 4839; Laws, 1916, ch. 122; Laws, 1938, ch. 177.

§ 69-15-115.
Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of Article 5 of this chapter, or any of the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health, relative to the control and eradication of tuberculosis, anthrax, hog cholera, Texas and splenic fever and the fever-carrying tick (Margaropus annulatus), cattle brucellosis, anaplasmosis, infectious bovine rhinotracheitis, muscosal disease, cattle viral diarrhea, cattle scabies, sheep scabies, swine erysipelas, swine brucellosis, equine encephalomyelitis, rabies, vesicular diseases, salmonella group, newcastle disease, infectious laryngotracheitis, ornithosis-psittacosis, mycoplasma group, equine infectious anemia and any suspected new and/or foreign diseases of livestock and poultry, and all other diseases of animals in this state, made and promulgated thereunder shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5506f; 1930, § 5424; 1942, § 4847; Laws, 1920, ch. 327; Laws, 1930, ch. 99; Laws, 1962, ch. 166, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-117.
All equidae located on premises where public participates in equine activities to be accompanied by copy of negative infectious anemia test; regulations; penalties.

All equidae located on any premises within the state where the public participates in equine activities for any purpose, including, but not limited to, training, breeding, performing or exhibition shall be accompanied by the original copy of a negative current equine infectious anemia (EIA) test. All equidae moving within the state for any reason shall be accompanied by the original copy of a negative current equine infectious anemia (EIA) test. Equidae being sold at a public sale or sold at a private sale shall have a negative current equine infectious anemia (EIA) test.

The Board of Animal Health shall promulgate rules and regulations to enforce this section.

Any person violating this section or the rules and regulations promulgated under this section by the Board of Animal Health is subject to the penalties provided in Section 69-15-65.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 573, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.